DI-757
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

DIAU7-01

DTC B 1628/29 RSCA Off Switch Indicator Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The RSCA switch is a mechanism that operates both right and left side of the curtain shield airbag assembly

andthe seatbelt pretensionerwhenthe airbag sensorassembly detects aroll —over.
The RSCA off switch indicator light is installed in the combination meter.
As operatingthe RSCA off switch, the indicator light comes onto inform the driver that the roll —overdetection
system is not working.
Theinitial settingoftheroll  —-overdetection systemis on. Iltautomatically operates every timethe ignition
switch is turned on.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* RSCA off switch
B1628/29 * RSCA offindicator circuit malfunction »Airbag sgnsorassembly
e Dashwire
¢ Instrument panelwire

HINT:
DTCB 1628/29isindicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
The RSCA off indicator light remains on when the RSCA off switch is not op-
erating (Remains ON).

1 Does indicator light turn off?

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the combination meter connector.
CHECK:
(@)  Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Check operation of RSCA off indicator light.
OK:

The indicator light does not light up.

NO> Check combination meter (See page BE-33).

YES
~_—

2 Check wire harness.

LOCK PREPARATION:
@ (@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnectthe negative ( -)terminal cable fromthe bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and RMSW
onthe airbag sensorassembly side betweenthe combination
ABOT17 H01293 Hotzes| Meterandairbag sensorassembly.
OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NG> Repair or replace wire harness.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Combination PREPARATION:
Meter (@ Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
:l _ (b) Connect the combination meter connector.
I: gggggr (c) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
Assembly and wait at least for 2 seconds.
] CHECK:
— (@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
- conds.
ON (b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
@ (¢)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.
(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
DTC B1628/29
conds.
(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).
OK:
DTC B2628/29 is not output.
HINT:
CodesotherthancodeB 1628/29 may be output atthistime, but
H01369 ABO119 .
H10600 H21234 neiza3| theyarenotrelevanttothis check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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The RSCA off indicator light does not come on when the RSCA off switch is
operating (Remains OFF).

1 | Check voltage of combination meter.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the combination meter connector.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage of the combination meter.
OK:

Voltage: 10 - 14V

NG> Check combination meter (See page BE-33).

OK

2 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the combination meter connector.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the body ground and RMSW on the combination meter side between the air-
bag sensor assembly and the combination meter.
OK:
Voltage: Below 1V

NG> Repair or replace wire harness.
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3 Check wire harness.

Airbag Sensor Assembly

o7

AB0119
H21169

H21525
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PREPARATION:

(@)

Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(b) Connect the combination meter connector.

(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 90
seconds.

(d) Disconnect the airbag sensor assembly connector.

(e) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and 1G2
on the airbag sensor assembly side.

OK:

Voltage: 10 - 14 V

NG> Repair or replace wire harness.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

4 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Combination
Meter
:l Airbag
I: Sensor
:| Assembly

H01369 AB0119
H10600 H21234

ON

&

DTC B1628/29

H21233

OK

PREPARATION:

Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
CHECK:

(@)

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

(d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTC B1628/29 is not output.

HINT:

Codes other than code B1628/29 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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